Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 2
PROGRAMS TO BE ADMINISTERED BY THE DEPARTMENT

25.5-1-201. Programs to be administered by the department of health care policy and financing.

The department of health care policy and financing shall administer the following programs and perform the following functions:

The "Colorado Medical Assistance Act", as specified in articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title;

The "Colorado Indigent Care Program", as specified in part 1 of article 3 of this title;

Effective July 1, 1996, school entry immunization, as specified in part 9 of article 4 of title 25, C.R.S. Commencing on and after the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1996, the state department is authorized to contract with the department of public health and environment for the purpose of enforcing the school entry immunization requirements.

Repealed.

The "Children's Basic Health Plan Act", as specified in article 8 of this title;

The old age pension health and medical care program, as specified in section 25.5-2-101;

The reproductive health-care program that provides contraceptive methods and counseling services, as specified in section 25.5-2-103;

Programs, services, and supports for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as specified in article 10 of this title 25.5; and

Any program concerning the wholesale importation of prescription drugs pursuant to part 2 of article 2.5 of this title 25.5.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire title added, p. 1102, § 15, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

(1)(f) and (1)(g) amended and (1)(h) added, p. 1669, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(g) and (1)(h)(II) amended and (1)(j) added, p. 511, § 4, effective May 16; (1)(j) added, p. 916, § 15, effective May 25.

L. 96:

(1)(b) and (1)(h)(I) repealed, p. 1474, § 27, effective June 1; (1)(i) and (1)(j) amended and (1)(k) added, p. 1437, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1)(l) added, p. 700, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(m) added, p. 916, § 11, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

(1)(h) repealed, p. 427, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(l) and (1)(m) amended and (1)(n) added, p. 2583, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(a) repealed, p. 772, § 51, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

Entire part amended, p. 1796, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(d) repealed, p. 2042, § 70, effective June 1.

L. 2011:

(1)(f) amended, (SB 11-210), ch. 187, p. 721, § 7, effective July 15, 2012.

L. 2013:

(1)(e) and (1)(f) amended and (1)(g) added, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1808, § 42, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2019:

IP(1), (1)(f), and (1)(g) amended and (1)(h) added, (SB 19-005), ch. 184, p. 2065, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1)(f.5) added, (SB 21-009), ch. 430, p. 2847, § 4, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 19-005, see section 1 of chapter 184, Session Laws of Colorado 2019. For the legislative declaration in SB 21-009, see section 1 of chapter 430, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

25.5-1-202. Advisory committee on covering all children in Colorado - reports - definitions - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1491, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(3)(b)(IV.5) added, p. 2027, § 3, effective June 3.

L. 2012:

Entire section repealed, (HB 12-1207), ch. 65, p. 229, § 1, effective March 24.

25.5-1-203. Prescription drug information and technical assistance program - expansion.

The state department may expand the prescription drug information and technical assistance program created in section 25.5-5-507 to include persons receiving drug benefits pursuant to any program that is administered by the state department.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 231, § 1, effective August 5.

25.5-1-204. Advisory committee to oversee the all-payer health claims database - creation - members - duties - legislative declaration - rules - report.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that an advisory committee for the all-payer health claims database would support the database in its established mission of facilitating the reporting of health-care and health quality data that results in transparent and public reporting of safety, quality, cost, and efficiency information; and analysis of health-care spending and utilization patterns for purposes that improve the population's health, improve the care experience, and control costs.

No later than August 1, 2013, the executive director shall appoint an advisory committee to oversee the Colorado all-payer health claims database. The advisory committee shall include the following members:

A member of academia with experience in health-care data and cost efficiency research;

A representative of:

A statewide association of hospitals;

An integrated multi-specialty organization;

Physicians and surgeons;

An organization that processes insurance claims or certain aspects of employee benefit plans for a separate entity;

A nonprofit organization that demonstrates experience working with employers to enhance value and affordability in health insurance;

Dental insurers;

Pharmacists or an affiliate society;

Pharmacy benefit managers;

A statewide association of ambulatory surgical centers;

A representative, who is not a supplier or broker of health insurance, of:

Small employers that purchase group health insurance for employees;

Large employers that purchase health insurance for employees;

Self-insured employers;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(a)(IV) is effective until July 1, 2024.] A representative from a community mental health center who has experience in behavioral health data collection;

(IV)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(a)(IV) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

A representative from a comprehensive community behavioral health provider, as defined in section 27-50-101, who has experience in behavioral health data collection;

Three representatives with a demonstrated record of advocating health-care issues on behalf of consumers;

Two representatives of health insurers, one who represents nonprofit insurers and one who represents for-profit insurers;

Two representatives of nonprofit organizations that facilitate health information exchange to improve health care for all Coloradans;

The executive director or his or her designee, serving as an ex officio member;

The commissioner of insurance or his or her designee, serving as an ex officio member;

A representative of the department of personnel, serving as an ex officio member;

The director of the office of information and technology or his or her designee, serving as an ex officio member; and

Two members of the general assembly, one appointed by the majority leader of the senate and one appointed by the majority leader of the house of representatives; except that, if the majority leaders are from the same political party, the minority leader of the house of representatives shall appoint the second member. The two members of the general assembly shall serve as ex officio members.

The advisory committee shall make recommendations to the executive director and the Colorado all-payer health claims database administrator related to the Colorado all-payer health claims database. The recommendations include the following:

Procedures for the collection, retention, use, and disclosure of data from the Colorado all-payer health claims database, including procedures and safeguards to protect the privacy, integrity, confidentiality, and availability of any data;

Guidelines for charging for custom reports from the Colorado all-payer health claims database;

Procedures to ensure compliance with the "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996", Pub.L. 104-191, as amended, and implementing federal regulations;

Procedures to ensure compliance with other state and federal privacy laws; and

Procedures for data confidentiality and data disposal if the Colorado all-payer health claims database ceases to exist.

The members of the advisory committee appointed pursuant to subparagraph (XII) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) are entitled to receive compensation and reimbursement of expenses as provided in section 2-2-326, C.R.S.

The administrator shall prepare and file annual reports to the legislature by March 1 of each year. The annual report must contain:

The uses of the data in the all-payer health claims database;

Public studies produced by the administrator;

The cost of administering the Colorado all-payer health claims database, the sources of the funding, and the total revenue taken in by the database;

The recipients of the data, the purposes for the data requests, and whether a fee was charged for the data;

A fee schedule displaying the fees for providing custom data reports from the Colorado all-payer health claims database.

The executive director shall require an evaluation of the Colorado all-payer health claims database initiative every five years beginning in 2018, to ensure that the database accomplishes the goals of this section. The report must contain metrics that document and demonstrate the achievements or challenges of the program goals.

By November 15, 2022, and by each November 15 thereafter, subject to available appropriations, the administrator shall provide a primary care spending report to the commissioner of insurance for use by the primary care payment reform collaborative established in section 10-16-150 regarding primary care spending:

By carriers, as defined in sections 10-16-102 (8) and 24-50-603 (2);

Under the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act", articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title 25.5; and

Under the "Children's Basic Health Plan Act", article 8 of this title 25.5.

The report prepared in accordance with this subsection (3)(c) must include:

The percentage of the medical expenses allocated to primary care;

The share of payments that are made through nationally recognized alternative payment models and the share of payments that are not paid on a fee-for-service or per-claim basis; and

Data related to the aligned quality measure set determined by the division of insurance in accordance with section 10-16-157 (3).

The administrator shall seek funding for the creation of the all-payer health claims database and develop a plan for the financial stability of the database. If sufficient funding is received through gifts, grants, and donations on or before January 1, 2012, as determined by the executive director, the administrator shall, in consultation with the advisory committee, create the Colorado all-payer claims database.

The general assembly may annually appropriate general fund money to the state department to pay for expenses related to the all-payer health claims database.

If sufficient funding is received, the executive director shall direct the administrator to create the database and the administrator shall:

Determine the data to be collected from payers and the method of collection, including mandatory and voluntary reporting of health-care and health quality data;

Seek to establish agreements for voluntary reporting of health-care claims data from health-care payers that are not subject to mandatory reporting requirements in order to ensure availability of the most comprehensive and systemwide data on health-care costs and quality;

Seek to establish agreements or requests with the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services to obtain medicare health claims data;

Determine the measures necessary to implement the reporting requirements in a manner that is cost-effective and reasonable for data sources and timely, relevant, and reliable for consumers, public and private purchasers, providers, and policymakers;

Determine the reports and data to be made available to the public with recommendations from the advisory committee in order to accomplish the purposes of this section, including conducting studies and reporting the results of the studies;

Collect, aggregate, distribute, and publicly report performance data on quality, health outcomes, health disparities, cost, utilization, and pricing in a manner accessible for consumers, public and private purchasers, providers, and policymakers;

Protect patient privacy in compliance with state and federal medical privacy laws while preserving the ability to analyze data and share with providers and payers to ensure accuracy prior to the public release of information;

Repealed.

Provide leadership and coordination of public and private health-care quality and performance measurements to ensure efficiency, cost-effectiveness, transparency, and informed choice by consumers and public and private purchasers.

The administrator, with input from the advisory committee:

Shall incorporate and utilize publicly available data other than administrative claims data if necessary to measure and analyze a significant health-care quality, safety, or cost issue that cannot be adequately measured with administrative claims data alone;

Shall require payer data sources to submit data necessary to implement the all-payer claims database;

Shall determine the data elements to be collected, the reporting formats for data submitted, and the use and reporting of any data submitted. Data collection shall align with national, regional, and other uniform all-payer claims databases' standards where possible.

May audit the accuracy of all data submitted;

May contract with third parties to collect and process the health-care data collected pursuant to this section. The contract shall prohibit the collection of unencrypted social security numbers and the use of the data for any purpose other than those specifically authorized by the contract. The contract shall require the third party to transmit the data collected and processed under the contract to the administrator or other designated entity.

May share data regionally or help develop a multistate effort if recommended by the advisory committee.

The all-payer health claims database shall:

Be available to the public when disclosed in a form and manner that ensures the privacy and security of personal health information as required by state and federal law, as a resource to insurers, consumers, employers, providers, purchasers of health care, and state agencies to allow for continuous review of health-care utilization, expenditures, and quality and safety performance in Colorado;

Be available to state agencies and private entities in Colorado engaged in efforts to improve health care, subject to rules promulgated by the executive director;

Be presented to allow for comparisons of geographic, demographic, and economic factors and institutional size;

Present data in a consumer-friendly manner.

The collection, storage, and release of health-care data and other information pursuant to this section is subject to the federal "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996", Pub.L. 104-191, as amended.

The executive director shall promulgate rules as necessary to implement this section, which rules shall include the assessment of a fine for a payer required to submit data that does not comply with this section. Any fines collected shall be deposited in the all-payer health claims database cash fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. The moneys in the fund shall be appropriated to the department of health care policy and financing for the purpose of maintaining the all-payer health claims database. The moneys in the fund shall remain in the fund and not revert to the general fund or any other fund at the end of any fiscal year.

Repealed.

If at any time, there is not sufficient funding to finance the ongoing operations of the database, the database shall cease operating and the advisory committee and administrator shall no longer have the duty to carry out the functions required pursuant to this section. If the database ceases to operate, the data submitted shall be destroyed or returned to its original source.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1330), ch. 299, p. 1406, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2013:

(1), (2), and (3) R&RE, (SB 13-149), ch. 152, p. 495, § 1, effective July 1; (10) repealed, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1689, § 80, effective August 7; (5)(a) amended, (HB 13-1115), ch. 338, p. 1973, § 16, effective March 31, 2015.

L. 2014:

(2)(a)(X) amended, (HB 14-1363), ch. 302, p. 1269, § 29, effective May 31; (2)(c) amended, (SB 14-153), ch. 390, p. 1965, § 24, effective June 6.

L. 2017:

(4) amended and (5)(h) repealed, (HB 17-1060), ch. 6, p. 15, § 4, effective March 1.

L. 2018:

(4) amended, (HB 18-1327), ch. 150, p. 942, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 2019:

(3)(c) added, (HB 19-1233), ch. 194, p. 2122, § 6, effective May 16.

L. 2022:

IP(3)(c)(I) and (3)(c)(II) amended, (HB 22-1325), ch. 181, p. 1209, § 3, effective August 10; (2)(a)(IV) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1593, § 231, effective July 1, 2024.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1233, see section 1 of chapter 194, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

25.5-1-204.5. All-payer health claims database scholarship grant program - creation - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Advisory committee" means the advisory committee to oversee the all-payer health claims database created pursuant to section 25.5-1-204.

"Governmental entity" means a state or local governmental entity, including a state-supported institution of higher education, but does not include the state department.

"Program" means the all-payer health claims database scholarship grant program established pursuant to this section.

There is created in the state department the all-payer health claims database scholarship grant program to defray the costs of nonprofit and governmental entities in accessing the all-payer health claims database to conduct research.

The state department shall:

In consultation with the advisory committee, develop a grant application under the program consistent with the rules of the executive director;

Accept applications for scholarship grants from any nonprofit or governmental entity needing access to the all-payer health claims database to conduct research;

After considering the recommendations of the advisory committee, determine which grant applications to approve and the amount of each grant; and

Distribute approved scholarship grants to nonprofit or governmental entities.

The executive director shall, following recommendations of the state department and the advisory committee, adopt rules pursuant to section 24-4-103 governing the program, including procedures, criteria, and standards for awarding scholarship grants.

The advisory committee shall:

Consult with the state department on the development of a grant application form; and

Review applications for scholarship grants and recommend which scholarship grants to approve and the amount of each recommended grant.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1327), ch. 150, p. 942, § 2, effective April 23.

25.5-1-204.7. All-payer health claims database - creation of tool for review of data included in the database - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Administrator" means the administrator of the all-payer health claims database.

"All-payer health claims database" or "database" means the all-payer health claims database created pursuant to section 25.5-1-204.

"Code" means CPT code, HCPCS code, or other packaged services or industry standard procedure code that may include time units, base unit values, or modifiers.

"CPT code" means the current procedural terminology code, or its successor code, as developed and copyrighted by the American Medical Association or its successor entity.

"Healthcare common procedure coding system code" or "HCPCS code" means the code established by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services' alpha-numeric editorial panel for identifying health-care services in a consistent and standardized manner.

"Private health-care payer" means a carrier, as defined in section 10-16-102 (8), that reports claims received from an out-of-network provider pursuant to section 12-30-113 (4).

"Tool" means the tool developed by the administrator pursuant to this section to enable users to review certain health claims reimbursement data in the database.

To facilitate the accurate determination of the reimbursement rates pursuant to sections 10-16-704 (3)(d) and (5.5)(b), 12-30-113 (4), and 25-3-122 (3) and to provide transparency in the process, subject to available appropriations, the administrator shall create and maintain a tool for implementation by January 1, 2023, that enables users to review certain health claims reimbursement data included in the all-payer health claims database. The tool must include 2018 health claims reimbursement data as the first year of data.

To the extent practicable, the tool must, at a minimum:

Include twenty-fifth, fiftieth, sixtieth, and seventy-fifth percentile of in-network reimbursement rates based on claims and the number of claims submitted for each code by payer type, for all codes with sufficient volume reported to the database, for three years of data; and

Be viewable and searchable by:

Year;

County;

Geographic rating area and statewide;

Payer type, including medicaid, medicare, and private health-care payers;

Setting, including inpatient and outpatient services; and

Specialty.

The administrator shall ensure that the viewing or reporting of health claims data through the tool complies with all state and federal data privacy laws and antitrust laws.

Subject to available appropriations, the administrator shall update the tool annually and may update the tool more frequently as determined by the administrator.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-068), ch. 266, p. 1935, § 1, effective May 27.

25.5-1-205. Providing for the efficient provision of health care through state-supervised cooperative action - rules.

Cooperation among health-care payors, including both private sector entities and federal and state-administered health-care programs, has the potential to eliminate needless and costly complexity in the administration of the programs and to benefit patients, payors, and the government. Further, alignment of financial incentives among private and public entities may accelerate and reinforce improvements in health-care quality and patient outcomes.

The executive director shall facilitate departmental oversight of collaboration among providers, medicaid clients and advocates, and payors that is designed to improve health outcomes and patient satisfaction and support the financial sustainability of the medicaid program.

The executive director may promulgate rules relating to the collaborative process set forth in this section.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1281), ch. 246, p. 1182, § 1, effective June 4.

25.5-1-206. School-based substance abuse prevention and intervention program - creation - reporting - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

The 2011 healthy kids Colorado survey indicates that the top three substances that high school students report they use are alcohol, marijuana, and prescription drugs;

With the legalization of marijuana by citizen initiative in Colorado, there is an increased availability of marijuana in the community and, at the same time, a decreased perception of harm related to marijuana use;

Evidence-based prevention and intervention programs and education awareness programs targeted to school children who are twelve to nineteen years of age are needed to:

Increase the perceived risk of harm associated with marijuana and alcohol use and prescription drug misuse;

Decrease the rates of youth marijuana and alcohol use and prescription drug misuse and delay the age of first-time use; and

Decrease the number of drug- and alcohol-related violations, suspensions, and expulsions reported by schools.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that it is appropriate to award grants to schools, community-based organizations, and health organizations to provide school-based prevention and intervention programs that use evidence-based strategies, practices, and approaches to reduce the risk of marijuana and alcohol use and prescription drug misuse by school-aged children. Successful school-based programs will lead to increased overall health, behavioral health, and educational outcomes for Colorado's youth.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Entity" means a school, school district, board of cooperative services, a nonprofit or not-for-profit community-based organization, or a community-based behavioral health organization.

"Grant program" means the school-based substance abuse prevention and intervention grant program created in subsection (3) of this section.

The school-based substance abuse prevention and intervention grant program is created within the state department. The purpose of the grant program is to award competitive grants to entities to provide school-based prevention and intervention programs for youth twelve to nineteen years of age primarily focused on reducing marijuana use, but including strategies and efforts to reduce alcohol use and prescription drug misuse.

To be considered for a competitive grant, the entity must demonstrate in the grant proposal that:

The grant will be used to implement evidence-based programs and strategies delivered in the school setting that are designed to improve overall health, behavioral health, and educational outcomes for youth who are twelve to nineteen years of age;

The entity is delivering the program and strategies to at-risk youth, regardless of the youths' eligibility for Colorado's medical assistance program; and

The evidence-based programs and strategies are designed to achieve the following outcomes:

An increase in the perceived risk of harm associated with marijuana use, prescription drug misuse, and underage alcohol use among youth who are twelve to nineteen years of age;

A decrease in the rates of youth marijuana use, alcohol use, and prescription drug misuse;

A delay in the age of first use of marijuana, alcohol, or prescription drug misuse;

A decrease in the rates of youth who have ever used marijuana or alcohol or misused prescription drugs in their lifetime; and

A decrease in the number of drug- and alcohol-related violations on school property, suspensions, and expulsions reported by schools.

On or before September 1, 2014, the state department shall establish procedures and timelines for grant applications, criteria for determining grant amounts and grantee reporting requirements, and any other grant program policies. The state department may amend these policies at any time.

Subject to available appropriations, the state department shall award grants for the 2014-15 academic year and for each academic year thereafter. There is no limit on the number of grants that the state department may award, and the same entity may receive more than one grant if the state department considers the needs of at-risk students in communities throughout the state for school-based substance abuse prevention and intervention programs.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-215), ch. 352, p. 1612, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(6) amended, (HB 17-1060), ch. 6, p. 15, § 5, effective March 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (6), effective November 2, 2017. (See L. 2017, p. 15.)

25.5-1-207. Rural provider access and affordability stimulus grant program - advisory committee - fund - reporting - rules - definitions - repeal.

Definitions - rules. As used in this section:

"Advisory committee" means the rural provider access and affordability advisory committee created in subsection (3)(a) of this section.

"Affiliate" has the meaning set forth in section 25.5-4-402.8 (1)(b).

"Frontier provider" means a provider that is located in a county in the state with a population density of six or fewer residents per one square mile.

"Fund" means the rural provider access and affordability fund created in subsection (6)(a) of this section.

"Grant program" means the rural provider access and affordability stimulus grant program established in subsection (2) of this section.

"Health-care access projects" means the projects described in subsection (2)(c)(II) of this section.

"Health-care affordability projects" means the projects described in subsection (2)(c)(I) of this section.

"Hospital" means a hospital licensed or certified pursuant to section 25-1.5-103 (1)(a) or an affiliate owned or controlled, as defined in section 25.5-4-402.8 (1)(c), by the hospital.

"Qualified rural provider" means a rural hospital that has a lower net patient revenue or fund balance compared with other rural hospitals, as determined by the state board by rule.

"Rural community" means:

A county with a population of fewer than fifty thousand residents; or

A municipality with a population of fewer than twenty-five thousand residents if the municipality is not contiguous to a municipality with a population of twenty-five thousand or more residents.

"Rural provider" means a hospital that is located in a rural community.

"Telemedicine" has the meaning set forth in section 12-240-104 (6).

Grant program - permissible uses of grant money.

The rural provider access and affordability stimulus grant program is hereby created in the state department. The purpose of the grant program is to provide state assistance in the form of grants to qualified rural providers based on financial need or the ability to expand health-care access. The grant program is intended to improve health-care affordability and access in rural communities.

In consultation with the advisory committee, the state department shall administer the grant program and shall award grants to qualified rural providers in accordance with this section. The grants are paid out of money in the fund.

Subject to the guidelines adopted pursuant to subsection (4) of this section and the rules promulgated by the state board pursuant to subsection (5)(b) of this section, qualified rural providers may use the money received through the grant program for:

Projects that modernize the information technology infrastructure of rural providers, including projects that:

Create a shared analytics platform and care coordination platforms among rural providers; and

Enable technologies, including telehealth and e-consult systems, that allow rural providers to communicate, share clinical information, and consult electronically to manage patient care; and

Projects that expand access to health care in rural communities, including projects that:

Extend hours for access to health care in rural communities, including access to primary care and behavioral health services;

Invest in dual track emergency department management in rural communities;

Expand access to telemedicine in rural communities, including remote monitoring support;

Provide new or replacement hospital beds in rural communities;

Expand access to remote patient monitoring systems in rural communities;

Expand access in rural communities to long-term care and recovery care in skilled nursing facilities; and

Create or expand sites that provide access in rural communities to surgical care; chemotherapy centers; imaging and advanced imaging, including magnetic resonance imaging and computerized tomography scans; and behavioral health care.

To be eligible to receive grant money for a capital expenditure, a grant recipient must submit to the state department a written justification as set forth in 31 CFR 35.6 (b)(4) for the capital expenditure; except that this requirement does not apply if the state department determines that the written justification is not required based on how the expenditures authorized under this section will be reported to the United States department of the treasury.

Advisory committee.

The rural provider access and affordability advisory committee is hereby created in the state department.

The advisory committee consists of the following voting members, appointed by the executive director:

One member representing the state department;

One member representing the department of public health and environment;

One member representing the office of ehealth innovation in the lieutenant governor's office;

One member representing a nonprofit organization with expertise in health care in rural communities;

Four members representing rural providers, including at least two frontier providers; and

One health-care consumer located in a rural community who is a member of the disabled community.

The executive director shall make all appointments to the advisory committee no later than August 1, 2022. Advisory committee members serve for the duration of the advisory committee. The executive director shall fill any vacancy by appointment.

The executive director shall convene the first meeting of the advisory committee no later than September 1, 2022. At the first meeting, the advisory committee shall select a chair and vice-chair from among its members. The advisory committee shall conduct at least two meetings each year and may agree to conduct meetings more frequently.

The advisory committee shall advise and make formal recommendations to:

The state department on:

The administration of the grant program;

The guidelines adopted pursuant to subsection (4) of this section; and

The selection of grant recipients; and

The state board on the rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

Guidelines.

On or before December 31, 2022, the state department, in consultation with the advisory committee, shall adopt guidelines for the grant program that include:

Procedures and timelines by which a qualified rural provider may apply for a grant;

Criteria for determining grant eligibility and grant amounts; and

Reporting requirements for grant recipients in accordance with subsection (8)(b) of this section and the rules promulgated by the state board pursuant to subsection (5)(c) of this section.

The state department shall post the guidelines on the state department's website.

Rules. On or before December 31, 2022, the state board, in consultation with the state department, shall promulgate rules as necessary for the administration of this section that include:

A methodology to determine which rural providers are considered qualified rural providers;

Permissible uses of grant money; and

Reporting requirements for grant recipients.

Fund.

The rural provider access and affordability fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of:

Money transferred to the fund pursuant to subsection (7) of this section;

Money appropriated or transferred to the fund by the general assembly; and

Any gifts, grants, or donations from any public or private sources, including governmental entities.

The state department is authorized to seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from public or private sources for the purposes of the grant program. The state department shall transmit all public or private money received through gifts, grants, and donations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the fund.

Except as otherwise required by this subsection (6)(c), all money not expended or encumbered, and all interest earned on the investment or deposit of money in the fund, must remain in the fund and shall not revert to the general fund or any other fund at the end of any fiscal year. The money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the state department for the purposes of this section. Any money in the fund not expended or encumbered by July 1, 2024, must revert to the economic recovery and relief cash fund created in section 24-75-228 (2)(a).

Transfer. No later than July 1, 2022, the state treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the economic recovery and relief cash fund created in section 24-75-228 (2)(a) to the fund. The state department shall use:

Four million eight hundred thousand dollars for awarding grants for health-care affordability projects;

Four million eight hundred thousand dollars for awarding grants for health-care access projects; and

Up to four hundred thousand dollars for the costs of administering the grant program.

Reporting.

In its presentation to the joint committees of reference pursuant to section 2-7-203, the state department shall report on the progress of the grant program, including a report on the amount of grant money awarded to each grant recipient and a description of each grant recipient's use of the grant money.

The state department and any person that receives money from the state department, including each grant recipient, shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

Repeal. This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2025.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-200), ch. 297, p. 2123, § 2, effective June 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 22-200, see section 1 of chapter 297, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.